es: Estilo de punta de descosedor: Punta de bola; Punta curva; Fina (precisión); Bifurcada (estándar); Otro
pt-PT: Tipo de ponta do descosedor: Ponta esférica; Ponta curva; Fina (precisão); Bifurcada (padrão); Outro
el: Στυλ άκρης ξηλωτή ραφών: Σφαιρική μύτη; Κυρτή μύτη; Λεπτή (ακριβείας); Διχαλωτή (τυπική); Άλλο
zh-CN: 拆线器尖端样式: 球形刀尖; 弯曲刀尖; 精细（精密）; 叉形（标准）; 其他
it: Stile della punta per taglia-cuciture: Punta a sfera; Punta curva; Sottile (di precisione); A forcella (standard); Altro
hu: Varrásbontó hegyének kialakítása: Golyós hegy; Hajlított hegy; Finom (precíziós); Villás (hagyományos); Egyéb
ro-RO: Stil al vârfului tăietorului de ață: Vârf cu bilă; Vârf curbat; Fin (precizie); Bifurcat (standard); Altele
ja: シームリッパー先端スタイル: ボールチップ; カーブチップ; 極細 (精密); フォーク型 (標準); その他
sv: Sömsprättare-spetsstil: Kulknopp; Böjd spets; Fin (precision); Grendelad (standard); Övrigt
cs: Styl hrotu páradla švů: Kuličkový hrot; Zakřivený hrot; Jemný (přesný); Vidlicový (standardní); Jiné
bg-BG: Стил на върха на разкъсвача на шевове: Със сферичен връх; С извит връх; Фин (прецизен); Раздвоен (стандартен); Други
lt-LT: Ardytuvo galiuko stilius: Su rutuliuku; Lenktas antgalis; Smulkus (tikslus); Šakutės formos (standartinis); Kita
tr: Dikiş sökücü uç tipi: Yuvarlak uç; Kıvrık uç; İnce (hassas); Çatallı (standart); Diğer
pl: Typ końcówki nożyka do szwów: Z kulką; Zakrzywiona końcówka; Cienka (precyzyjna); Rozwidlona (standardowa); Inny
sl-SI: Stil konice za paranje šivov: S kroglico; Ukrivljena konica; Fina (natančna); Viličasta (standardna); Drugo
th: ปลายแบบเลาะตะเข็บ: หัวกลม; หัวโค้ง; หัวแหลม (แม่นยำ); หัวแฉก (มาตรฐาน); อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrh rasparača šavova: Kuglasti vrh; Zakrivljeni vrh; Fini (precizni); Račvasti (standardni); Ostalo
de: Spitzenform des Nahttrenners: Kugelspitze; Gebogene Spitze; Fein (Präzision); Gegabelt (Standard); Sonstige
vi: Đầu mũi dụng cụ tháo chỉ: Đầu bi; Đầu cong; Mảnh (chính xác); Có chạc (tiêu chuẩn); Khác
zh-TW: 拆線刀尖樣式: 圓頭; 彎頭; 細頭 (精密); 叉狀頭 (標準); 其他
ru: Тип наконечника распарывателя: С шариком на конце; Изогнутый наконечник; Тонкий (прецизионный); Раздвоенный (стандартный); Другое
sk-SK: Štýl koncoviek odstraňovača švov: Guľôčkový hrot; Zakrivený hrot; Jemný (presný); Rozdvojený (štandardný); Iné
da: Stil for sømopsprætters spids: Kuglespids; Buet spids; Fin (præcision); Tvedelt (standard); Andet
fi: Ratkojan kärjen tyyppi: Pallokärki; Käyrä kärki; Hieno (tarkkuus); Haarukkamainen (standardi); Muu
nl: Tornmes puntstijl: Balpunt; Gebogen punt; Fijn (precisie); Gevorkt (standaard); Overig
pt-BR: Descosturador estilo da ponta: Ponta esférica; Ponta curva; Fina (precisão); Bifurcada (padrão); Outros
nb: Spretteknivspiss – utforming: Kulespiss; Buet spiss; Fin (presisjon); Gaffel (standard); Annet
en: Seam ripper tip style: Ball tip; Curved tip; Fine (precision); Forked (standard); Other
ko: 솔기 뜯개 끝 모양: 볼 팁; 곡선 팁; 파인(정밀형); 포크형(표준); 기타
fr: Type de pointe du découseur: Pointe à bille; Pointe courbée; Fine (précision); Fourchue (standard); Autre